District of Columbia statutes.
22-3010.02

Arranging for a sexual contact with a real or fictitious child.

(a)

It is unlawful for a person to arrange to engage in a sexual act or sexual contact with an individual (whether real or fictitious) who is or who is represented to be a child at least 4 years younger than the person, or to arrange for another person to engage in a sexual act or sexual contact with an individual (whether real or fictitious) who is or who is represented to be a child of at least 4 years younger than the person. For the purposes of this section, arranging to engage in a sexual act or sexual contact with an individual who is fictitious shall be unlawful only if the arrangement is done by or with a law enforcement officer.

(b)

A person who violates subsection (a) of this section shall be imprisoned for not more than 5 years, fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, or both.

May 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-257, § 209b
as added June 3, 2011, D.C. Law 18-377, § 11(a), 58 DCR 1174
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 232(n), 60 DCR 2064
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “an amount not to exceed $50,000” in (b).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 232(n) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.